Louisiana, session 2026, SB223.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 14:39.3 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§39.3. Failure to test for alcohol and controlled substances resulting in serious
bodily injury or death
A. A violation of this Section is committed by a motor carrier when all
of the following conditions exist:
(1) The motor carrier is required by 49 CFR Part 382 to test an operator
of a commercial motor vehicle for alcohol and controlled substance use.
(2) The motor carrier fails to conduct the testing required by 49 CFR
Part 382.
(3) The operator of a commercial motor vehicle who is required to be
tested by the motor carrier pursuant to Paragraph (1) of this Subsection, but
Page 1 of 3
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-549 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 223
has not been tested as described in Paragraph (2) of this Subsection, causes an
accident while operating the commercial vehicle under the influence of alcohol
or under the influence of a controlled substance.
(4) The accident described in Paragraph (3) of this Subsection results in
the serious bodily injury or death of another person.
B. For purposes of this Section:
(1) "Commercial motor vehicle" has the same meaning as provided by
49 CFR 382.107.
(2) "Motor carrier" means any person subject to the provisions of 49
CFR Part 382, Subpart A.
(3) "Operator" means any person operating a commercial motor vehicle,
and includes but is not limited to full time, regularly employed drivers, casual,
intermittent or occasional drivers, leased drivers, and independent
owner-operator contractors.
(4) "Under the influence of alcohol" means that the operator had a blood
alcohol concentration of 0.04 percent or more by weight based on grams of
alcohol per one hundred cubic centimeters of blood.
C. A motor carrier who violates the provisions of this Section shall be
fined not more than twenty-five thousand dollars, or imprisoned for not more
than one year, or both.